Arkansas, session 2025, HB1686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-73-312(a)(2), concerning revocation of a
license to carry a concealed handgun, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Any law enforcement officer making an arrest of a
licensee for a violation of this subchapter or any other statutory violation
that requires revocation of a license to carry a concealed handgun shall
confiscate the license and forward it to notify the Director of the Division
of Arkansas State Police.
(B) The license shall be held until a determination of the
charge is finalized, with the appropriate disposition of the license after
the determination.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-73-314 is amended to read as follows:
5-73-314. Lost, destroyed, or duplicate license — Change of address.
(a) Within thirty (30) days after the changing of a permanent address,
or within thirty (30) days after having a license to carry a concealed
handgun lost, the licensee shall notify the Director of the Division of
Arkansas State Police in writing of the change or loss.
(b) If a license to carry a concealed handgun is lost or destroyed, or
*LGL133*
03/04/2025 4:12:08 PM LGL133

HB1686
a duplicate is requested, the person to whom the license to carry a concealed
handgun was issued shall comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section and may obtain a duplicate license or replacement license upon:
(1) Paying the Division of Arkansas State Police a fee
established by the director under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act,
§ 25-15-201 et seq.; and
(2) Furnishing a notarized statement to the division that the
license to carry a concealed handgun has been lost or destroyed or that a
duplicate is requested.
(c) The fee described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be
reduced by fifty percent (50%) if a person sixty-five (65) years of age or
older is requesting a replacement or duplicate license under this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-73-315(b), concerning identification of a
licensee for authority to carry a concealed handgun, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The licensee shall:
(1) Carry the license, or an electronic copy of the license in
an acceptable electronic format, together with valid identification, at any
time when the licensee is carrying a concealed handgun; and
(2) Display both the license, or an the electronic copy of the
license in an acceptable electronic format, and proper identification upon
demand by a law enforcement officer.













03/04/2025 4:12:08 PM LGL133